gc_lang/fr/oxt/Dictionnaires/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX a4 Y 103
SFX a4 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX a4 er ant/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çant/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX a4 ger geant/n'q'l'm't's' ger
SFX a4 er e/n'q'j'l'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer ye/n'q'j'l'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ie/n'q'j'l'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er è/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX a4 er es/n'q'l'm't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yes/n'q'l'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ies/n'q'l'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er ons/n'q'l't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çons/n'q'l't' cer
SFX a4 ger geons/n'q'l't' ger
SFX a4 er ez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX a4 er ent/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yent/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ient/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er ais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çais/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX a4 ger geais/n'q'j'l'm't' ger
SFX a4 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çait/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX a4 ger geait/n'q'l'm't's' ger
SFX a4 er ions/n'q'l't' er
SFX a4 er iez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX a4 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çaient/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX a4 ger geaient/n'q'l'm't's' ger
SFX a4 er ai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çai/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX a4 ger geai/n'q'j'l'm't' ger
SFX a4 er as/n'q'l'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer ças/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX a4 ger geas/n'q'l'm't' ger
SFX a4 er a/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer ça/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX a4 ger gea/n'q'l'm't's' ger
SFX a4 er âmes/n'q'l't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çâmes/n'q'l't' cer
SFX a4 ger geâmes/n'q'l't' ger
SFX a4 er âtes/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çâtes/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX a4 ger geâtes/n'q'l'm' ger
SFX a4 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX a4 er erai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yerai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ierai/n'q'j'l'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er eras/n'q'l'm't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yeras/n'q'l'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ieras/n'q'l'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er era/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yera/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer iera/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er erons/n'q'l't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yerons/n'q'l't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ierons/n'q'l't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er erez/n'q'l'm' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yerez/n'q'l'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ierez/n'q'l'm' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er eront/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yeront/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ieront/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er erais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yerais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ierais/n'q'j'l'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er erait/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ierait/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er erions/n'q'l't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yerions/n'q'l't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ierions/n'q'l't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er eriez/n'q'l'm' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yeriez/n'q'l'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ieriez/n'q'l'm' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er eraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer yeraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ieraient/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er asse/n'q'j'l'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çasse/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX a4 ger geasse/n'q'j'l'm't' ger
SFX a4 er asses/n'q'l'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çasses/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX a4 ger geasses/n'q'l'm't' ger
SFX a4 er ât/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çât/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX a4 ger geât/n'q'l'm't's' ger
SFX a4 er assions/n'q'l't' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çassions/n'q'l't' cer
SFX a4 ger geassions/n'q'l't' ger
SFX a4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çassiez/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX a4 ger geassiez/n'q'l'm' ger
SFX a4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çassent/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX a4 ger geassent/n'q'l'm't's' ger
SFX a4 er e/n'l'm't' [^y]er
SFX a4 yer ye/n'l'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a4 yer ie/n'l'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a4 er ons/n'l' [^cg]er
SFX a4 cer çons/n'l' cer
SFX a4 ger geons/n'l' ger
SFX a4 er ez/n'l'm' er

SFX a5 Y 103
SFX a5 er er/n'q'd'm't's' er
SFX a5 er ant/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çant/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geant/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er e/n'q'j'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer ye/n'q'j'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ie/n'q'j'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er è/n'm't' er
SFX a5 er es/n'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yes/n'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ies/n'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er ons/n't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çons/n't' cer
SFX a5 ger geons/n't' ger
SFX a5 r z/n'm' er
SFX a5 er ent/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yent/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ient/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er ais/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çais/n'j'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geais/n'j'm't' ger
SFX a5 er ait/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çait/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geait/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er ions/n't' er
SFX a5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX a5 er aient/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çaient/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geaient/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er ai/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çai/n'j'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geai/n'j'm't' ger
SFX a5 er as/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer ças/n'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geas/n'm't' ger
SFX a5 er a/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer ça/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger gea/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er âmes/n't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çâmes/n't' cer
SFX a5 ger geâmes/n't' ger
SFX a5 er âtes/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çâtes/n'm' cer
SFX a5 ger geâtes/n'm' ger
SFX a5 er èrent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX a5 er erai/n'j'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerai/n'j'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierai/n'j'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eras/n'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeras/n'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieras/n'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er era/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yera/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer iera/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erons/n't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerons/n't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierons/n't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erez/n'm' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerez/n'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierez/n'm' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eront/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeront/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieront/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erais/n'j'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerais/n'j'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierais/n'j'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erait/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerait/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierait/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erions/n't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerions/n't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierions/n't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eriez/n'm' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeriez/n'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieriez/n'm' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eraient/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeraient/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieraient/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er asse/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çasse/n'j'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geasse/n'j'm't' ger
SFX a5 er asses/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çasses/n'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geasses/n'm't' ger
SFX a5 er ât/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çât/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geât/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er assions/n't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çassions/n't' cer
SFX a5 ger geassions/n't' ger
SFX a5 er assiez/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çassiez/n'm' cer
SFX a5 ger geassiez/n'm' ger
SFX a5 er assent/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çassent/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geassent/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er e/n'm' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer e/n'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ie/n'm' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er ons/n' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer çons/n' cer
SFX a5 ger geons/n' ger
SFX a5 er ez/n'm' er
